Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1047.
do enact as follows:SB1047,11Section 1. 51.422 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB1047,2,8251.422 (4) Rate updates. Each January 1, beginning January 1, 2027, the 3department shall update the rates for substance use disorder treatment services 4with medications for opioid use disorder to be equivalent to the corresponding state-5specific, locality-adjusted Medicare rates for the same or comparable services in the 6calendar year in which the services are provided. The rates established under this 7subsection do not apply to federally qualified health centers, rural health centers, 8Indian health services facilities, or certified community behavioral health centers.SB1047,21Section 2. DHS 75.59 (3) (nm) of the administrative code is created to read:SB1047,3,42DHS 75.59 (3) (nm) “Practitioner” means a health care professional who is 3appropriately licensed by a state to prescribe or dispense medications for opioid use 4disorders and, as a result, is authorized to practice within an OTP.SB1047,35Section 3. DHS 75.59 (5) (b) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB1047,3,236DHS 75.59 (5) (b) Medical director. The service shall designate a physician 7licensed under ch. 448, Stats., as its medical director. The medical director shall 8have at least one year of experience in addiction medicine or addiction psychiatry, 9be licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy, and meet all other requirements 10listed in s. DHS 75.03 (52). If a service is not able to secure a medical director who 11meets the one year of experience requirement, as documented through recruitment 12efforts, there shall be a specific plan for the person to acquire equivalent training 13and skills within 4 months after beginning employment. The medical director, 14service physician, or mid-level practitioner that has a federal exception approved by 15SAMHSA and the SOTA to 42 CFR 8.12 (b), (e), (h), and (i) shall be physically 16present at the OTP at least 40 percent of the time that the program administers or 17dispenses medication in order to comply with s. DHS 94.08, assure regulatory 18compliance, and carry out duties specifically assigned by regulation as required by 19SAMHSA under 42 CFR 8.12. OTPs in the first 60 days of operation may reduce the 20time requirement medical directors or practitioners must be present on site to at 21least 20 percent of the time that the program administers or dispenses medication. 22On the 61st day of operation the service shall be subject to the requirements of this 23rule.SB1047,424Section 4. DHS 75.59 (5) (c) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB1047,4,41DHS 75.59 (5) (c) Nurses. The service shall have a registered nurse or 2licensed practical nurse on staff to supervise the dosing process and perform other 3functions delegated by the physician. A registered nurse shall be physically on the 4premises any time dosing is occurring.SB1047,55Section 5. DHS 75.59 (5) (e) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB1047,4,146DHS 75.59 (5) (e) Licensed counselors. The service shall employ at least one 7of the following: substance abuse counselors, substance abuse counselors-in 8training, licensed marriage and family therapists, licensed professional counselors, 9licensed clinical social workers, certified advanced practice social workers, certified 10independent social workers, or clinical substance abuse counselors who are under 11the supervision of a clinical supervisor. An OTP shall employ one of these 12identified clinicians for a minimum of one full-time equivalent of 40 hours per week 13for every 55 enrolled patients in the service. All counselors rostered to the service 14are subject to this ratio.SB1047,615Section 6. DHS 75.59 (6) (a) 1. of the administrative code is amended to 16read:SB1047,5,217DHS 75.59 (6) (a) 1. ‘Maintenance treatment for an adult.’ The service shall 18maintain current procedures determined by the service physician to ensure that 19patients are admitted to maintenance treatment by qualified personnel who have 20determined, using accepted medical criteria, such as those listed in the DSM, that 21the person is currently addicted to an opioid drug, and that the person became 22addicted at least one year before admission for treatment. In addition, a service 23physician shall ensure that each patient voluntarily chooses maintenance 24treatment and that all relevant facts concerning the use of the opioid drug are 1clearly and adequately explained to the patient, and that each patient provides 2informed written consent to treatment.SB1047,73Section 7. DHS 75.59 (6) (a) 2. of the administrative code is amended to 4read:SB1047,5,105DHS 75.59 (6) (a) 2. ‘Maintenance treatment for a minor.’ A minor shall be 6eligible for maintenance treatment only if the minor has had at least 2 documented 7unsuccessful attempts at short-term detoxification or drug-free treatment within a 812-month period. No minor may be admitted to maintenance treatment unless a 9parent, legal guardian, or responsible adult designated by the relevant state 10authority consents in writing to such treatment.SB1047,811Section 8. DHS 75.59 (6) (a) 3. of the administrative code is repealed.SB1047,912Section 9. DHS 75.59 (6) (e) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB1047,5,2413DHS 75.59 (6) (e) 1. For each patient eligible for admission, the service shall 14arrange for a comprehensive physical examination and clinically indicated 15laboratory work-up. The comprehensive physical examination shall be ordered by 16the service physician practitioner on the day of admission and shall include a 17complete blood count and liver function testing. The service shall test for Hepatitis 18A, B, C and HIV if the patient gives informed consent in writing. If the patient 19declines permission to test shall be documented in the patient’s record. Screening 20examinations may be completed by a non-OTP practitioner up to 7 days prior to 21admission. Full examination must be completed within 14 days and may be 22completed by a non-OTP practitioner with review by an OTP provider. An updated 23comprehensive physical examination including lab work shall be completed 24annually.SB1047,101Section 10. DHS 75.59 (6) (f) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB1047,6,112DHS 75.59 (6) (f) Initial dose. If a person meets the admission criteria under 3par. (a), an initial dose of an FDA-approved medication may be administered to the 4patient on the day of admission. For each new patient enrolled in a service, the 5initial dose of methadone shall not exceed 30 50 milligrams and the total dose for 6the first day shall not exceed 40 milligrams, unless the service physician documents 7in the patient’s record that 40 milligrams did not suppress opioid abstinence 8symptoms milligrams, unless the practitioner finds sufficient medical rationale, 9including if the patient is transferring from another OTP on a higher dose that has 10been verified, and documents in the patient’s record that a higher dose was 11clinically indicated.SB1047,1112Section 11. DHS 75.59 (6) (i) 3. of the administrative code is amended to 13read:SB1047,6,1514DHS 75.59 (6) (i) 3. Determines and verifies the patient’s age. If the patient 15is a minor, the policy shall require documentation as provided in par. (a) 2.SB1047,1216Section 12. DHS 75.59 (11) (a) of the administrative code is amended to 17read:SB1047,6,2118DHS 75.59 (11) (a) Dose determination. The dose determination for a patient, 19including if split dosing is appropriate, is a matter of clinical judgment by a 20physician practitioner in consultation with the patient and appropriate clinical 21staff.SB1047,1322Section 13. DHS 75.59 (11) (f) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB1047,7,523DHS 75.59 (11) (f) Initial methadone dose. A patient’s initial dose shall be 24based on the service physician’s practitioner’s evaluation of the history and present 1condition of the patient. The initial dose of methadone may not exceed 30 50 2milligrams except that the total dose for the first day may not exceed 40 milligrams, 3unless the practitioner finds sufficient medical rationale, including if the patient is 4transferring from another OTP on a higher dose that has been verified, and 5documents in the patient’s record that a higher dose was clinically indicated.SB1047,146Section 14. DHS 75.59 (11) (h) of the administrative code is created to read:SB1047,7,127DHS 75.59 (11) (h) Split dosing. An OTP may provide split dosing when, in 8the clinical judgment of the OTP practitioner, such dosing is medically appropriate. 9The practitioner’s determination and clinical rationale shall be documented in the 10patient’s medical record. No additional testing or documentation beyond routine 11clinical practice may be required, and any laboratory testing, including peak and 12trough level, shall be at the discretion of the practitioner.SB1047,1513Section 15. DHS 75.59 (13) of the administrative code is repealed and 14recreated to read:SB1047,7,2115DHS 75.59 (13) Criteria for unsupervised use. (a) To limit the potential 16for diversion of medication used for the treatment of opioid use disorder to the illicit 17market, medication dispensed to a patient for unsupervised use shall be subject to 18the requirements under this subsection. Any patient in an OTP may receive their 19individualized take-home doses as ordered for days that the clinic is closed for 20business, on one weekend day, and on state and federal holidays, no matter their 21length of time in treatment, as allowed under 42 CFR 8.12 (i) (1).SB1047,8,222(b) For take-home doses beyond those allowed under par. (a), a practitioner 23shall review and document the criteria under 42 CFR 8.12 (i) (2) when determining 24whether dispensing medication for a patient’s unsupervised use is safe and it is 1appropriate to set, increase, or extend the amount of time between visits to the 2OTP.SB1047,8,43(c) A determination under par. (b), including the basis of the determination, 4shall be documented by a practitioner in the patient’s medical record.SB1047,165Section 16. DHS 75.59 (14) of the administrative code is repealed and 6recreated to read:SB1047,8,117DHS 75.59 (14) Restrictions for unsupervised use of methadone 8hydrochloride. If a practitioner assesses, determines, and documents that a 9patient meets the criteria under sub. (13) and that a patient can safely manage 10unsupervised doses of methadone, the number of take-home doses the patient 11receives shall be limited by the number allowed under 42 CFR 8.12 (i) (3).SB1047,1712Section 17. DHS 75.59 (14m) of the administrative code is created to read:SB1047,8,2013DHS 75.59 (14m) Restriction exceptions. When a practitioner has reason 14to accelerate the number of unsupervised use doses of methadone hydrochloride, 15the practitioner shall comply with the requirements under 42 CFR 8.12 and the 16criteria for unsupervised use and shall use the exception process provided by the 17federal center for substance abuse treatment division of pharmacologic therapies. 18For the purposes of enforcement of this subsection, the department has authority to 19monitor an OTP for compliance with federal regulations and may take licensing 20actions on the basis of the department’s determination of noncompliance.SB1047,1821Section 18. DHS 75.59 (16) (a) 8. of the administrative code is repealed. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1047 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1047 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1047 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1047 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1047: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting